dev/apertium-ne-en.ne.dix
    <pardef n="बोक__vblex">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>िदिने</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="ppe"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="सेत/्__vblex">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ै</l>
          <r>्<s n="vblex"/><s n="ppd"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="उठ/्__opt">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ाउन्</l>
          <r>्<s n="opt"/><s n="mf"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/><s n="fam"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="रह__vblex">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>नोस्</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="impers"/><s n="infml"/><s n="imp"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ने</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="ppe"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ना</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="ppe"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>े</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="ppe"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ेछस्</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="prft"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/><s n="mf"/><s n="infml"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>िछस्</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="prft"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/><s n="mf"/><s n="infml"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ेछौ</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="smpl"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/><s n="mf"/><s n="fam"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ेछ</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="smpl"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/><s n="m"/><s n="infml"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>न्छ</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="smpl"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/><s n="m"/><s n="infml"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ेनछ</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="smpl"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/><s n="m"/><s n="infml"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="पिउँ__vblex">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>दै</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="ppd"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>दा</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="ppd"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ने</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="ppe"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>छस्</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="prft"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/><s n="mf"/><s n="infml"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="वस/्__vblex">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>्ने</l>
          <r>्<s n="vblex"/><s n="ppe"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ौं</l>
          <r>्<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="smpl"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="सुक__vblex">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ाउँदा</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="ppd"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="हाँस/्__opt">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ौंला</l>
          <r>्<s n="opt"/><s n="m"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ु</l>
          <r>्<s n="opt"/><s n="m"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="उराठ__vblex">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>लाग्दो</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="ppd"/><s n="m"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>लाग्दी</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="ppd"/><s n="f"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="सर्__opt">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>यौँ</l>
          <r><s n="opt"/><s n="m"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="आउ__vblex">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>नुस्</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="impers"/><s n="infml"/><s n="imp"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>नुहोस</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="impers"/><s n="infml"/><s n="imp"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>दा</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="ppd"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ने</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="ppe"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="पाल्__vblex">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>नोस्</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="impers"/><s n="infml"/><s n="imp"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>दा</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="ppd"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ने</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="ppe"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="उम्र__vblex">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>न</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="ppe"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="डुवाइ__vblex">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>स्</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="prft"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/><s n="mf"/><s n="infml"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="सम्__vblex">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>झें</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="smpl"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="छान__vblex">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>िनु</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="ppe"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="सोध/्__vblex">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>्नुहोस्</l>
          <r>्<s n="vblex"/><s n="impers"/><s n="infml"/><s n="imp"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>्नोस्</l>
          <r>्<s n="vblex"/><s n="impers"/><s n="infml"/><s n="imp"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>्नुस्</l>
          <r>्<s n="vblex"/><s n="impers"/><s n="infml"/><s n="imp"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>्ने</l>
          <r>्<s n="vblex"/><s n="ppe"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>े</l>
          <r>्<s n="vblex"/><s n="ppe"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>्यो</l>
          <r>्<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="smpl"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/><s n="m"/><s n="infml"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>िनस्</l>
          <r>्<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="prft"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/><s n="mf"/><s n="infml"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ें</l>
          <r>्<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="smpl"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>्छु</l>
          <r>्<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="smpl"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ौं</l>
          <r>्<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="smpl"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>्छौ</l>
          <r>्<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="smpl"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/><s n="mf"/><s n="fam"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="काट__vblex">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="impers"/><s n="infml"/><s n="imp"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ने</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="ppe"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="वास्__vblex">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ना</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="ppe"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <e lm="नगर्"><i>नगर्</i><par n="काट__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="उठ्"><i>उठ</i><par n="उठ/्__opt"/></e>
    <e lm="ढाँट्"><i>ढाँट</i><par n="वस/्__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="सुक"><i>सुक</i><par n="सुक__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="हप्क"><i>हप्क</i><par n="सुक__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="काट"><i>काट</i><par n="काट__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="रह"><i>रह</i><par n="रह__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="पिउँ"><i>पिउँ</i><par n="पिउँ__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="छान्"><i>छान</i><par n="वस/्__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="विगार्"><i>विगार्</i><par n="उम्र__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="हास्"><i>हास्</i><par n="सर्__opt"/></e>
    <e lm="थाल्"><i>थाल्</i><par n="सर्__opt"/></e>
    <e lm="डुवाइ"><i>डुवाइ</i><par n="डुवाइ__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="पाल्"><i>पाल्</i><par n="पाल्__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="वस्"><i>वस</i><par n="वस/्__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="सेत्"><i>सेत</i><par n="सेत/्__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="आउ"><i>आउ</i><par n="आउ__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="वास्"><i>वास्</i><par n="वास्__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="सोध्"><i>सोध</i><par n="सोध/्__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="सर्"><i>सर्</i><par n="सर्__opt"/></e>
    <e lm="छान"><i>छान</i><par n="छान__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="उम्र"><i>उम्र</i><par n="उम्र__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="बोक"><i>बोक</i><par n="बोक__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="उराठ"><i>उराठ</i><par n="उराठ__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="किन"><i>किन</i><par n="बोक__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="लैजा"><i>लैजा</i><par n="काट__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="सम्"><i>सम्</i><par n="सम्__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="भिन्"><i>भिन्</i><par n="वास्__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="सुनाउ"><i>सुनाउ</i><par n="काट__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="हाँस्"><i>हाँस</i><par n="हाँस/्__opt"/></e>
